es: Diseño de estetoscopio: Doble cabezal; Cabeza única; Otros
zh-CN: 听诊器设计: 双头; 单头; 其他
el: Σχεδιασμός στηθοσκοπίου: Διπλή κεφαλή; Μονοκέφαλος; Άλλο
ru: Конструкция стетоскопа: С двумя головками; С одной головкой; Другой
fr: Design du stéthoscope: Double tête; Tête unique; Autre
th: การออกแบบหูฟังแพทย์: สองหัว; หัวเดียว; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Дизайн на стетоскоп: Двойна глава; Единична глава; Други
ja: 聴診器のデザイン: デュアルヘッド; シングルヘッド; その他
da: Stetoskopdesign: Dobbelthoved; Enkelthoved; Andet
fi: Stetoskoopin muotoilu: Kaksipäinen; Yksipäinen; Muu
vi: Thiết kế ống nghe: Đầu kép; Đầu đơn; Khác
ko: 청진기 디자인: 듀얼 헤드; 싱글 헤드; 기타
it: Modello dello stetoscopio: Testa doppia; Testa singola; Altro
hr-HR: Izgled stetoskopa: Dvoglavi; Jednoglavi; Ostalo
nl: Stethoscoopontwerp: Dual-head; Single-head; Andere
hu: Stetoszkóp kialakítása: Kétfejű; Egyfejű; Egyéb
de: Stethoskopdesign: Doppelkopf; Einzelkopf; Sonstiges
pl: Konstrukcja stetoskopu: Podwójna głowica; Pojedyncza głowica; Inne
pt-BR: Formato do estetoscópio: Cabeça duplo; Cabeça única; Outro
ro-RO: Design stetoscop: Cap dublu; Un singur cap; Altele
cs: Typ stetoskopu: Dvouhlavý; Jednohlavý; Jiné
lt-LT: Stetoskopo dizainas: Dvipusis; Vienpusis; Kita
nb: Stetoskopdesign: Dobbelthode; Enkelthode; Annet
tr: Stetoskop Tasarımı: Çift kafalı; Tek kafalı; Diğer
sk-SK: Dizajn stetoskopu: Dvojhlavý; Jednohlavý; Iné
pt-PT: Design de estetoscópio: Cabeça dupla; Cabeça individual; Outro
en: Stethoscope design: Dual-head; Single-head; Other
sv: Stetoskopdesign: Dubbelt huvud; Enkelt huvud; Övrigt
zh-TW: 聽診器設計: 雙頭; 單頭; 其他
sl-SI: Dizajn stetoskopa: Dvojna glava; Enoglava; Drugo